Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202676-1401
Act, how cited.

Sections 76-1401 to 76-1449 shall be known and may be cited as the Uniform Residential Landlord and Tenant Act.

Laws 1974, LB 293, § 1;

Laws 1991, LB 324, § 1;

Laws 2021, LB320, § 2;

Laws 2025, LB80, § 47.

Procedures authorized by section 76-1401 et seq. provide a public housing tenant with all the required elements of due process prior to eviction, and a public housing tenant is not entitled to a prior grievance procedure where the eviction is based upon the tenant's creation or maintenance of a threat to the health or safety of other tenants or public housing authority employees. Housing Auth. of City of Lincoln v. Wolfe, 212 Neb. 657, 324 N.W.2d 891 (1982).